trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="NC_IZE_ARR">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC00000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>klasista</l> 
        <r>clasista</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>forte</l> 
        <r>forte</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>errefuxiatu</l> 
        <r>refugiado</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oinarrizko_kirol</l> 
        <r>deporte_base</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gas_instalazio</l> 
        <r>instalación_de_gas</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hiri-autobus</l> 
        <r>bus_urbano</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akatsen_portzentaje</l> 
        <r>porcentaje_de_defecto</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>koltza-olio</l> 
        <r>aceite_de_colza</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>galtzorratz</l> 
        <r>aguja_de_hacer_punto</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urte_zibil</l> 
        <r>año_civil</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>bakailao_berri</l> 
        <r>bacalao_fresco</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>martsupio</l> 
        <r>bolsa_marsupial</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>biziarteko_kartzela-zigor</l> 
        <r>cadena_perpetua</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zikiro</l> 
        <r>carnero_castrado</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>santio_handi</l> 
        <r>cigarra_de_mar</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urrutiko_kontrol</l> 
        <r>control_remoto</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>bete-beteko_arduraldi</l> 
        <r>dedicación_plena</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zeru-ekuatore</l> 
        <r>ecuador_celeste</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gari-zainzuri</l> 
        <r>espárrago_triguero</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>foke</l> 
        <r>foque_principal</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>atxiki_handi</l> 
        <r>gran_chistera</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inurri_beltz</l> 
        <r>hormiga_negra</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>azken_judizio</l> 
        <r>juicio_final</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elkartze-lege</l> 
        <r>ley_asociativa</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hariztatzeko_ardatz</l> 
        <r>macho_de_terrajar</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tarteko_memoria</l> 
        <r>memoria_tampón</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>argizari-museo</l> 
        <r>museo_de_cera</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>desira-perpaus</l> 
        <r>oración_desiderativa</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lizpaper</l> 
        <r>papel_de_lija</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pisu_gordin</l> 
        <r>peso_bruto</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>karguak_kentzeko_orri</l> 
        <r>pliego_de_descargo</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jabetza_pribatu</l> 
        <r>propiedad_privada</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erregistro_zibil</l> 
        <r>registro_civil</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lohitako_barbarin</l> 
        <r>salmonete_común</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>berunezko_soldadu</l> 
        <r>soldadito_de_plomo</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tona_metriko</l> 
        <r>tonelada_métrica</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>negarrezko_haran</l> 
        <r>valle_de_lágrimas</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sasi-txori_arrunt</l> 
        <r>zarcero_pálido</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>bihar_ere_eguna_argituko_du</l> 
        <r>mañana_será_otro_día</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Nafarroako_Aldizkari_Ofizial</l> 
        <r>boletín_oficial_de_navarra</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kontratuaren_iraupen</l> 
        <r>duración_de_el_contrato</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ospitale_orokor</l> 
        <r>hospital_general</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ordena_juridiko</l> 
        <r>orden_jurídico</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kultur_antropologia</l> 
        <r>antropología_cultural</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itsasoko_fauna</l> 
        <r>fauna_marina</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>administrazio-errekurtso</l> 
        <r>recurso_administrativo</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
